Missouri, session 2026, HB17.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, and program described herein for the item or items stated, and
for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the unexpended balances available as of June 30, 2025,
but not to exceed the amounts stated herein, as follows:
Section 17.000. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part
of a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be
construed to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the
stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation
identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an
addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal
periods beyond June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-time
may, however, be requested in any future fiscal period as a new
decision item.

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 2
Section 17.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at the Special Acres School for the Severely Disabled
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.005, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.005, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,593,046
Section 17.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at the Autumn Hill State School
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.007, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.010, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$2,094,880
Section 17.015. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a school district located in any city with more than seventy-one
thousand but fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants for
equipment purchases and upgrades in technical programs located
in any city with more than seventy-one thousand but fewer than
seventy-nine thousand inhabitants, provided that no local match
is required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.147, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.020, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,269,938

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 3
Section 17.020. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a school district located in any city with more than thirty-six
thousand five hundred but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants
for equipment, design, renovation, construction, and
improvements of a career and technical school located in any city
with more than thirty-six thousand five hundred but fewer than
forty thousand inhabitants, provided that no local match be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.149, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.030, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$220,166
Section 17.025. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a learning center serving children with disabilities, including a
childcare program for children with disabilities, located in any
city with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty-one
thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county with more
than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.297, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.040, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,095,362
Section 17.030. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a statewide education organization whose directors consist entirely
of public school board members for a center located in any city
with more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than
one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants to provide experience-
based realistic training for school safety officials, educators and

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 4
first responders that is focused on prevention, preparedness,
response, and recovery
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.096, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.041, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,752,204
Section 17.035. To Lincoln University
For expansion and renovation of the nursing education facility
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.190, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.055, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,987,748
Section 17.040. To the University of Missouri
For the design and construction of a new veterinary laboratory, provided
that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local
match rate in order to be eligible for state funds pursuant to
Section 173.480, RSMo
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.170, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.060, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,592,146
Section 17.045. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the design of a medical school located in a city with more than
seventy-one thousand but fewer than seventy-nine thousand
inhabitants, provided that any funds disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 5
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.009, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.070, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$299,999
Section 17.050. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the design, planning, and construction, to include equipment and lab
space, of a manufacturing innovation center in a city not within a
county, provided that local matching funds must be provided on
a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.260, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.075, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$15,000,000
Section 17.055. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the design and construction of a medical school located in a city with
more than seventy-one thousand but fewer than seventy-nine
thousand inhabitants, provided that any funds disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.261, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.080, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$700,000
Section 17.060. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 6
For the University of Missouri Fischer Delta Research, Extension and
Education Center, for the continuation of the construction for the
soil laboratory and maintenance on existing structures, provided
that no local match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.262, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.085, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,729,751
Section 17.065. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri Fischer Delta Research, Extension and
Education Center, for the construction, maintenance, repairs,
improvements, upgrades and maintenance on existing structures,
to the greenhouse and farm buildings, provided that no local
match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.263, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.090, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 17.070. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Mineral Area Community College
For a veterinary technician program, provided that no local match be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.040, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$215,500
Section 17.071. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 7
For Crowder College
For a veterinary technician program, provided that no local match be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.041, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$123,174
Section 17.072. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Metropolitan Community College
For a veterinary technician program, provided that no local match be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.043, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$197,500
Section 17.073. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Moberly Area Community College
For a veterinary technician program, provided that no local match be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.044, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$250,000
Section 17.075. To the Department of Transportation
For the maintenance and repair of minor and low volume routes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.307, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.095, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$28,340,254
Section 17.080. To the Department of Transportation

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 8
For improvements, renovations, maintenance and repair at an airport
located in any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer
than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than seventeen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
inhabitants, provided that no local matching funds be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.321, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.100, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$850,000
Section 17.085. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at the Capitol Complex
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2018, Section 18.020, an Act of the 99th
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.105, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1308) ..................................$1,056,278
Section 17.090. To the Office of Administration
For repairs and renovations to the south lawn fountain located on the
Capitol Complex
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.250, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.110, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,097,913
Section 17.095. To the Office of Administration
For the repair and refurbishment of the Capitol building plumbing

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 9
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.270, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.130, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$4,034,388
Section 17.100. To the Office of Administration
For the repair and renovation of the bronze doors located in the Capitol
building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.275, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.135, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ...........................................................................$7,080
Section 17.105. To the Office of Administration
For repairs and renovations of the Legislative Library
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.295, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.155, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$378,895
Section 17.115. To the Office of Administration
For capital improvements to support the largest and most prestigious
single-sport event host city to a non-profit performing arts center
that delivers accessible live entertainment for all audiences,
superior theatre arts education, impactful outreach programs and
events that utilize the venue, and helps sustain community
engagement programming that impacts nearly twenty-five
thousand locals each year and to a private non-profit organization
that connects all people to each other and the natural world to
promote understanding, appreciation and conservation, located in

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 10
any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county, provided that appropriations
shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 5, Section 5.236, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.170, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,909,878
Section 17.120. To the Office of Administration
For the repair and restoration of the bronze doors located in the Capitol
building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.130, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.175, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation
Fund (1202) ....................................................................................................$1,581,059
Section 17.125. To the Office of Administration
For distribution to a nonprofit organization for the restoration of the sole
remaining structures of three small school buildings where
African American children were educated before desegregation
in a county with more than one hundred thousand but fewer than
one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than four thousand but fewer than six thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.347, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.185, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$100,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 11
Section 17.130. To the Office of Administration
For planning, design, construction, renovation, acquisition, upgrades,
redevelopment, and unprogrammed funding for state-owned
properties statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.005, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) .................................................................$1,392,858
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ............................................. 5,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,392,858
Section 17.135. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For a grant to a Missouri-based, not-for-profit organization that is
contracted with the International Federation of Association
Football and responsible for planning and logistics related to the
2026 World Cup activities in and around any city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2005, Section 5.230, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$17,500,000
Section 17.140. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Agriculture and Small Business Development Authority, for
biofuel infrastructure projects
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.410, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.200, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$752,007
Section 17.145. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the State Fair

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 12
For planning, design, construction, renovation, land acquisition, and
upgrades of facilities at the State Fair
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.015, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.205, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,727,524
Section 17.150. To the Department of Agriculture
For the planning, design and construction of a meat laboratory facility
that will be used for training, education, technical support, and
research on a land grant university located in any city with more
than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one
hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.022, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.210, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$24,561,744
Section 17.155. To the Department of Agriculture
For the planning, design, construction, and renovation of a Veterinary
Medical Diagnostic Laboratory on a land grant university located
in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but
fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, provided that
such building shall be named in honor of Doctor Dan Brown
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.081, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.215, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$42,407,877
Section 17.160. To the Department of Agriculture

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 13
For the planning, design and construction of a meat laboratory facility
that will be used for training, education, technical support, and
research on a land grant university located in any city with more
than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one
hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.022, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,000,000
Section 17.165. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the planning, design, construction and renovation of Eckles Hall
located at the University of Missouri-Columbia for the Missouri
Wine and Grape Institute Research Center and Viticulture
Facility
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.030, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 17.170. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.015, an Act of the 100th
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.220, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$500,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 14
Section 17.175. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.005, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.225, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .....................................................................$1,962,672
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ............................ 1,481,357
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,444,029
Section 17.180. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Big Lake State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.010, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.230, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,979,997
Section 17.185. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Cuivre River State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 15
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.015, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.235, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,747,162
Section 17.190. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Current River State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.020, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.240, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$8,571,800
Section 17.195. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Dr. Edmund A. Babler State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180
through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.025, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.245, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$3,378,674
Section 17.200. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 16
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Echo Bluff State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.030, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.250, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$140,913
Section 17.205. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Finger Lakes State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.035, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.255, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,424,654
Section 17.210. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Harry S Truman State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.040, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.260, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$871,698
Section 17.215. To the Department of Natural Resources

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 17
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Johnson's Shut-Ins State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.045, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.265, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .......................................$13,026
Section 17.220. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Lake of the Ozarks State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.050, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.270, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$2,615,291
Section 17.225. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Lewis and Clark State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.055, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.275, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 18
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,206,045
Section 17.230. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Long Branch State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.060, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.280, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$2,283,103
Section 17.235. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Montauk State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.065, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.285, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,197,621
Section 17.240. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Onondaga Cave State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.070, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 19
17.290, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .......................................$30,750
Section 17.245. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Roaring River State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.075, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.295, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$550,284
Section 17.250. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at St. Francois State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.080, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.300, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$3,913,611
Section 17.255. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Stockton State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.085, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 20
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.305, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$670,106
Section 17.260. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Table Rock State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.090, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.310, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$5,188,813
Section 17.265. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Thousand Hills State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.095, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.315, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$871,698
Section 17.270. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Trail of Tears State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 21
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.100, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.320, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$840,195
Section 17.275. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Wakonda State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.105, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.325, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,713,711
Section 17.280. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Watkins Woolen Mill State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180
through 17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.110, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.330, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$4,000,919
Section 17.285. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Weston Bend State Park, provided one hundred percent

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 22
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.180 through
17.285
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.115, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.335, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$817,755
Section 17.290. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For the planning, design, construction, and installation of direct current
fast charging (DCFC) equipment with a minimum of 100
kilowatts, for meter for fee electric vehicle charging stations
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.370, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.340, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$170,785
Section 17.295. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For the planning, design, and construction of a pedestrian trail
originating at Knob Noster State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.375, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.350, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$889,181
Section 17.300. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 23
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.020, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.355, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .................................$8,000,000
From State Park Sales Tax Fund (1613) ......................................................................3,340,582
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ............................................................... 5,852,295
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,192,877
Section 17.305. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Nathan and Olive Boone Homestead Historic Site
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.025, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.360, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$200,000
Section 17.310. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Bennett Spring State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.030, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.365, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 24
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$347,054
Section 17.315. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Roaring River State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.035, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.370, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$737,059
Section 17.320. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Bryant Creek State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.040, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.375, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$591,180
Section 17.325. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Big Oak Tree State Park Boardwalk
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.045, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.380, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$425,000
Section 17.330. To the Department of Natural Resources

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 25
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of the
Pelster House Barn
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.050, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.385, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ....................................................$311,000
Section 17.335. To the Department of Natural Resources
For maintenance, repair, and other improvements to state-owned historic
properties and other state-owned historical assets in Missouri
connected to African American history and culture in Missouri
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.053, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.390, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ...........................................................................$1,574,600
Section 17.340. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of a flood wall
located in any city not within a county, provided that local match
be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.395, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
For water infrastructure improvements and projects for any city with
more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than two hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 26
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.395, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................25,000,000
For water infrastructure improvements and projects for any county with
more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twelve
thousand six hundred but fewer than fifteen thousand inhabitants,
provided that any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation
be matched on a 75/25 basis by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.395, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................30,000,000
For water infrastructure improvements and projects for any city with
more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen
thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with
more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.395, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 3,913,168
Total .........................................................................................................................$63,913,168
Section 17.345. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for a sewer treatment facility located in any city

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 27
with more than two thousand four hundred but fewer than two
thousand seven hundred inhabitants and located in a county with
more than two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three
hundred thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.400, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,000,000
For water infrastructure improvements and projects located in any city
with more than seven hundred sixty but fewer than eight hundred
fifty-five inhabitants and located in a county with more than six
thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with fewer than three hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.400, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,000,000
For the maintenance, repair, and capital improvements for sewer updates
located in any village with more than eighteen but fewer than
twenty-six inhabitants and located in a county with more than
fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than twelve thousand six hundred but
fewer than fifteen thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.400, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................15,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 28
For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, repair, or capital
improvements for a sewer project located in a city with more than
seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants and that
is the county seat of a county with more than thirty-five thousand
but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants, provided that any grant
awards disbursed from this appropriation be matched on a 90/10
basis by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.400, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,000,000
For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, or repair of a bridge
located in any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand
but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, at a lake that
provides the main source of drinking water for the city
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.400, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 2,500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,515,000
Section 17.350. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 29
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.170, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.405, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .................................$7,997,789
From State Park Sales Tax Fund (1613) ......................................................................4,055,106
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ............................................................... 5,647,789
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,700,684
Section 17.355. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of the
Route 66 State Park Historic Bridge
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.175, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.410, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .....................................................................$6,000,000
Section 17.360. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at the Shepherd of the Hills State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.180, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.415, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .....................................................................$2,600,000
Section 17.365. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Big Lake State Park

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 30
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.185, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.420, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$900,000
Section 17.370. To the Department of Natural Resources
For a public agency governed by a 12-member appointed board with the
mission to make the St. Louis region a more vibrant place to live,
work and play by developing a regional network of greenways,
provided that no local match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.393, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.425, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,000,000
Section 17.375. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.010, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From State Park Sales Tax Fund (1613) ....................................................................$9,500,000
Section 17.380. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, repair, or capital
improvements for a sewer project located in a city with more than

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 31
four thousand four hundred but fewer than four thousand nine
hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than sixty
thousand but fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, repair, or capital
improvements of a sewer project in a city with more than one
thousand one hundred seventy but fewer than one thousand three
hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than sixty
thousand but fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................850,000
For a water infrastructure project located in city with more than one
thousand one hundred seventy but fewer than one thousand three
hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with
more than seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................50,000
For drinking water and sewer infrastructure improvements in any city
with more than one thousand three hundred but fewer than one
thousand five hundred inhabitants and partially located in a
county with more than eight thousand but fewer than eight
thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than three hundred but fewer than six hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,400,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 32
Section 17.385. To the Department of Natural Resources
For any city with more than four thousand four hundred but fewer than
four thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in a county
with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than four thousand but fewer than five thousand inhabitants for
utility and water improvements and upgrades related to strategic
mining and battery materials processing
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.292, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
Section 17.390. To the Department of Natural Resources
For a flood protection improvement project located in city with more
than seven hundred sixty but fewer than eight hundred fifty-five
inhabitants and located in a county with more than seven
thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with fewer than four hundred eighty inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.303, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Flood Resiliency Improvement Fund (1238) ......................................................$800,000
For a flood resiliency project in any county with more than five thousand
but fewer than six thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than nine hundred but fewer than one thousand six
hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.303, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Flood Resiliency Improvement Fund (1238) ............................................. 600,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,400,000
Section 17.395. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the construction of a dump station located in Van Meter State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.352, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 33
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..............................................................................$500,000
For the construction of a public restroom located in Roaring River State
Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.352, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................... 125,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$625,000
Section 17.396. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure grants and loans, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between other funds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.235, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ...................................................$436,070,665
From Water and Wastewater Loan Revolving Fund (1602) ............................... 711,483,714
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,147,554,379
Section 17.400. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition and
development; financial assistance to other public agencies or in
partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement on
department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the 100th
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.430, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) .............................................................$500,000
Section 17.405. To the Department of Conservation

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 34
For major improvements and repairs (including materials, supplies, and
labor) to buildings, roads, hatcheries, signage, and other
departmental structures; and for soil conservation activities,
erosion control, and land improvement on department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.055, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.435, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ..........................................................$4,000,000
Section 17.410. To the Department of Conservation
For stormwater and flooding repairs at George O. White State Forest
Nursery and Little River Conservation Area
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3020, Section 20.350, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.440, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ..........................................................$2,000,000
Section 17.415. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition and
development; financial assistance to other public agencies or in
partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement on
department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.190, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.445, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 35
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ..........................................................$2,300,000
Section 17.420. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition and
development; financial assistance to other public agencies or in
partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement on
department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.015, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ........................................................$28,000,000
Section 17.425. To the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design, and construction of a park above an interstate
in any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 7, Section 7.024, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.460, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$28,600,000
Section 17.430. To the Department of Economic Development
For a nonprofit innovation community that focuses on accelerating
inclusive economic growth located in any city not within a county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 7, Section 7.031, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.465, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$542,343

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 36
Section 17.435. To the Department of Economic Development
For a 501(c)3 non-profit corporation focused on greater downtown
community development located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county established by a membership organization representing
business, organizations and other investors, for the purpose of
riverfront parking infrastructure
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2007, Section 7.021, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,500,000
For a 501(c)3 non-profit corporation focused on greater downtown
community development located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county established by a membership organization representing
business, organizations and other investors, for the purpose of
riverfront streambank improvements
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2007, Section 7.021, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 5,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,500,000
Section 17.440. To the Department of Economic Development
For the maintenance and improvements of a sports complex located in
any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer
than two hundred thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2007, Section 7.023, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,500,000
Section 17.445. To the Department of Economic Development
For the construction and installation of a monument dedicated to Route
66 located in any county with more than two hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 37
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2007, Section 7.150, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 17.446. To the Department of Economic Development
For a non-profit organization located in any city with more than fifty-
eight thousand but fewer than sixty-four thousand inhabitants that
is organized exclusively for charitable, religious, educational,
and scientific purposes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2007, Section 7.020, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 17.450. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For planning, design, and construction of a new Troop A Headquarters
and related facilities
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.125, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.480, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................$3,164,182
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ................................................... 3,437,180
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,601,362
Section 17.455. To the Office of Administration
For the Missouri State Highway Patrol
For security and safety improvements at regional highway patrol
headquarters
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.235, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.490, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 38
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$586,980
Section 17.460. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For construction of a new columbarium wall and infrastructure upgrades
throughout the cemetery grounds at Higginsville Veterans
Cemetery
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.195, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.495, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Veterans’ Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ....................$3,120,360
Section 17.465. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For construction of a new columbarium wall, pre-placed crypts, and
infrastructure upgrades throughout the cemetery grounds at
Springfield Veterans Cemetery
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.200, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.500, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Veterans’ Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ....................$6,067,581
Section 17.470. To the Department of Public Safety
For distribution to a county with more than seventeen thousand six
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer than ten
thousand inhabitants, for the planning, design, and construction
of a veterans' memorial, provided that local matching funds must
be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.502, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 39
17.505, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,011,118
Section 17.475. To the Department of Public Safety
For a public safety training facility located in any county with more than
two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2008, Section 8.005, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 17.480. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.030, an Act of the 100th
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.515, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) .................................................................$90,210
Section 17.485. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of an addition to the aircraft maintenance
facility at AVCRAD Base in Springfield and design and
construction of a readiness center and maintenance hangar at
AVCRAD Base in Springfield
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.035, an Act of the 100th
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.520, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ........................................................$102,860,565
Section 17.490. To the Office of Administration

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 40
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.025, an Act of the 100th
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.525, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Adjutant General-Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................$1,400,000
Section 17.495. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.130, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.530, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Adjutant General-Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................$1,700,000
Section 17.500. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of an elevator at the Ike Skelton Training
Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.135, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.535, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$463,342
Section 17.505. To the Department of the National Guard
For capital improvements and maintenance and repair to a joint civilian
and military owned and operated airport located in a city with
more than seventy-one thousand but fewer than seventy-nine
thousand inhabitants

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 41
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.395, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.540, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$963,075
Section 17.510. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.060, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.545, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Adjutant General-Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................$4,350,000
Section 17.515. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design, land acquisition, and construction of the Bellefontaine
Neighbors Readiness Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.065, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.550, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Adjutant General-Federal Fund (1190) ..........................................................$22,137,451
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .............................................................. 7,481,004
Total .........................................................................................................................$29,618,455
Section 17.520. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction at the Albany Readiness Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.075, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 42
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.555, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$927,569
Section 17.525. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.205, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.560, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Adjutant General-Federal Fund (1190) ..........................................................$30,000,000
Section 17.530. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design, land acquisition, and construction of the Bellefontaine
Neighbors Readiness Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.210, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.565, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,999,091
From Adjutant General-Federal Fund (1190) ...................................................... 15,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$19,999,091
Section 17.535. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For land acquisition, renovation, and repairs at Jefferson Barracks
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,190,525
For the design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 43
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Adjutant General-Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................30,000,000
For the renovation, construction, and upgrades to the Rosecrans Air
National Guard Base
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Adjutant General-Federal Fund (1190) ...................................................... 28,600,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$63,790,525
Section 17.540. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new community supervisory center in the southwest region of
Missouri
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.220, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.570, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$10,185,393
Section 17.545. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at the Fulton Reception and Diagnostic Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.225, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.575, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$14,124,902
Section 17.550. To the Office of Administration

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 44
For the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design, and construction at the Southeast Missouri
Mental Health Center warehouse
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.140, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.585, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$286,762
Section 17.555. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For the construction of a 200-bed mental health hospital in conjunction
with a non-state governmental acute care hospital operating
inpatient behavioral health beds in a state-owned facility
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.099, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.595, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Federal Earnings Fund (1558) ......................................................................$135,000,000
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................86,840,425
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 30,000,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$251,840,425
Section 17.560. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the purpose of providing funding to a certified community behavioral
health organization headquartered in any county with more than
two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred
thousand inhabitants to establish a sixteen-bed residential facility
for youth with severe behavioral health issues as part of a youth
resiliency campus in any city with more than one hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.110, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 45
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.600, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,818,834
Section 17.565. To the Department of Mental Health
For an autism center headquartered in a county with more than one
million inhabitants, provided any grant awards disbursed from
this appropriation shall be matched on a 1:1 basis by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.415, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.615, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,500,000
Section 17.570. To the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design and construction of an inpatient children’s acute
psychiatric hospital located at a residential treatment facility in a
county with more than one million inhabitants operated by a
non-profit entity that currently operates or is part of a health
system that operates acute/inpatient children’s psychiatric
hospitals and psychiatric residential treatment facilities with
extensive experience in trauma-informed care and adapting the
latest neuroscience to treatment, offering youth full medical,
psychiatric, clinical, and educational services, provided that local
matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.530, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.620, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$6,352,148
Section 17.571. To the Department of Mental Health
For improvements to a residential supportive housing campus for a not
for-profit organization founded in 1969, located in any city with

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 46
more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more
than one county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2010, Section 10.092, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,500,000
Section 17.572. To the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design, construction, expansion, and operation of a
behavioral health facility of a hospital founded in 1958 and
located in any city with more than four thousand four hundred
but fewer than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants and
located in a county with more than two hundred thirty thousand
but fewer than two hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2010, Section 10.093, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,000,000
Section 17.573. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For safety and security upgrades at the Southeast Missouri Mental Health
Center
Expense and Equipment
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2010, Section 10.315, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................$2,465,931
Section 17.575. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, and construction at the W.E. Sears Youth
Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.080, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.625, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 47
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,076,174
Section 17.580. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, and construction at the Camp Avery Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.085, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.630, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,806,512
Section 17.585. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new youth center in the St. Louis region
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.230, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.650, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,226,945
Section 17.590. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a youth enrichment center in any county with more than nineteen
thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than six thousand but fewer than
eight thousand five hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.158, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$750,000
Section 17.595. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 48
For a community development organization dedicated to individual and
family well-being through social services, behavioral health
counseling and the arts in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county in order
to build a stronger city by working toward creating a community
for individuals and families to be healthy, safe and able to thrive
through embracing inclusion, cultivating growth and inspiring
hope
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.160, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 17.600. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit in a county with more than two hundred thirty
thousand but fewer than two hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
serving individuals with intellectual and developmental
disabilities to redevelop the organization’s living facilities to
increase capacity, improve accessibility, and integrate on-site
support services
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.171, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
Section 17.605. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For safety renovations and general operating expenses to a nonprofit
organization established in 1911 that enhances independence,
empowers individuals, and enriches the lives of people who are
visually impaired or blind located in a city not within a county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.191, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$654,273
Section 17.610. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 49
For programming and capital improvements for a nonprofit organization
that is headquartered in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
provides rehabilitation, career training, employment services,
education, and advocacy for individuals experiencing vision loss
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.192, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 17.615. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
provides a cognitive behavior modification based program that
allows its students to master in the creative arts of their choice
and take part in paid internships to become market value assets
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.235, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$100,000
For a nonprofit organization in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
operates a center that provides educational and health services,
and hands-on training in fine arts and digital literacy for
underserved urban youth
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.235, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For a nonprofit organization serving youth for over twenty years that
enables young people to reach their full potential as productive,
caring, responsible citizens by providing a club experience,
including after school and summer programs that assures success
located in any city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer
than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 50
a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.235, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 2,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,100,000
Section 17.620. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For building renovations for a not-for-profit organization in any city with
more than fourteen thousand but fewer than sixteen thousand
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than
thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants
that provides a teen resource drop-in center for area homeless,
runaway, and at-risk youth, ages 13-20, offering social and
academic programs and services without judgement
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.248, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 17.625. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit community organization founded in 1976 and located
in city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county to purchase a building for their
core operations and make any necessary renovations
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.249, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 17.630. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For a not-for-profit hospital that is part of a not-for-profit healthcare
system based in any city with more than sixteen thousand but
fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and located in more
than one county, provided that funds are to be used for the

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 51
planning, design, construction, and equipment of a radiation
oncology center to be located in any county with more than
twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than fourteen thousand but
fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.771, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,000,000
For the construction of an integrated acute medical and behavioral health
care inpatient unit, acute mental health crisis center, and partial
hospitalization program in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county
operated by a non-profit pediatric hospital with extensive
experience in acute care and pediatric research
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.771, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................25,000,000
For a regional medical center in any city with more than eight thousand
but fewer than nine thousand inhabitants and partially located in
a county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-two thousand inhabitants to purchase capital equipment
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.771, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,761,000
For a computed tomography scanner used to provide assistance in cancer
and other critical event diagnosis, for a hospital located in any
city with more than nine thousand but fewer than ten thousand
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than
nineteen thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.771, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 52
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................425,000
For a MRI machine, for a hospital located in any city with more than two
thousand four hundred but fewer than two thousand seven
hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than
thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than ten thousand but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.771, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,500,000
For a nonprofit healthcare foundation in any county with more than
twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
than twelve thousand inhabitants for the construction of a hospital
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.771, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .............................................................. 5,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$48,686,000
Section 17.635. To the Department of Social Services
For demolition, planning, design, construction, equipment, and/or
renovation needs for an emergency room at a hospital located in
county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.773, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
Section 17.701. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing three

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 53
lanes in each direction on I-70 to be funded from state road bond
proceeds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.428, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.425,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From State Road Fund I-70 Project Bond Proceeds Fund (1323) ......................$1,400,000,000
Section 17.702. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing three
lanes in each direction on I-70 pursuant to a financing agreement
between the Commission and the Office of Administration
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.429, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.430,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From State Road Fund I-70 Project Fund (1324) ...............................................$1,400,000,000
Section 17.703. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing on I-44
from Missouri Route T to Missouri Route 68, from US Route 160
to Missouri Route 125, and from I-49 to Missouri Route 249 and
rebuild pavement and improve the I-44/Route 13 interchange and
the I-44/I-49 interchange and other I-44 Tier 2 and Tier 3 projects
listed on the Unfunded Needs List, to be funded from state road
bond proceeds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.433, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From State Road Fund I-44 Improvement Bond Proceeds Fund (1337) ...............$363,750,000
Section 17.704. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing on I-44
from Missouri Route T to Missouri Route 68, from US Route 160

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 54
to Missouri Route 125, and from I-49 to Missouri Route 249 and
rebuild pavement and improve the I-44/Route 13 interchange and
the I-44/I-49 interchange and other I-44 Tier 2 and Tier 3 projects
listed on the Unfunded Needs List pursuant to a financing
agreement between the Commission and the Office of
Administration
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.434, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From State Road Fund I-44 Improvement Fund (1338) ........................................$363,750,000
Section 17.706. To the Department of Transportation
For a transportation cost-share program with local communities,
provided that these funds shall not supplant, and shall only
supplement, the current planned allocation of road and bridge
expenditures under the most recently adopted state transportation
and improvement plan, including all amendments thereto, as of
the date of passage of this bill by the General Assembly, and
provided that the Department of Transportation and the
Department of Economic Development work cooperatively to
select projects with the greatest economic benefit to the State
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.445, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.450,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$64,653,670
Section 17.707. To the Department of Transportation
For an environmental impact study related to improvements to the
Interstate 44 corridor
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.446, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.455,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$19,702,749

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 55
Section 17.708. To the Department of Transportation
For distribution to a county with more than two hundred thousand but
fewer than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants, for the
planning, design, and construction of a bridge and improvements
to the two roads connected by said bridge, as well as other
intersection improvements related to an economic development
project, provided that no local matching funds shall be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.447, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.455,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$11,716,661
Section 17.711. To the Department of Transportation
For an engineering study and work on Highway BB bridge over Interstate
35 in a city with more than eight thousand but fewer than nine
thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county with more
than nineteen thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand
inhabitants and improving the exit and entrance ramps for said
intersection and route BB east of said intersection
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.455, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 17.712. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, right of way acquisition, utility improvements
and relocation, upgrades and construction of U.S. Highway 67 in
any county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$60,000,000
From State Road Fund (1320).............................................................................. 90,000,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$150,000,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 56
Section 17.713. To the Department of Transportation
For the maintenance, repair and upgrades to LeCompte Road, located in
any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer
than two hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that no local
match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,400,000
Section 17.714. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, designing and constructing of an interchange and outer
services road improvements in the Interstate 70 corridor in any
county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight
thousand but fewer than ten thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$40,000,000
Section 17.716. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and construction of an intersection and road
improvements on US Highway 65 and Missouri Route B in any
county with more than forty-two thousand but fewer than forty-
four thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
twenty thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,700,000
Section 17.717. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and construction of an interchange and road
improvements on I-49 and US Highway 58 in any county with
more than one hundred five thousand but fewer than one hundred
ten thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
ten thousand but fewer than twelve thousand inhabitants

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 57
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$20,000,000
Section 17.718. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, designing, construction and improvements of U.S.
Highway 63 in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five
thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,200,000
Section 17.719. To the Department of Transportation
For planning, designing, acquisition, and construction of additional
passing lanes on U.S. Highway 65 between any city with more
than three thousand but fewer than three thousand four hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifteen
thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three
thousand but fewer than three thousand six hundred inhabitants
and any city with more than two thousand one hundred fifty but
fewer than two thousand four hundred inhabitants and located in
a county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than one thousand but fewer than two thousand two
hundred twenty inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$38,000,000
Section 17.721. To the Department of Transportation
For the Maintenance Program
For the maintenance and repair of low-volume routes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.460, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 58
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$100,000,000
Section 17.722. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For a non-profit organization founded in 1982 - and located in a county
with more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than four thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants – that
serves seniors ages 60 and over for the development and
implementation of an integrated transit planning system and
services for seniors, veterans, and the disabled in a county with
more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than four thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants, a
county with more than two hundred thirty thousand but fewer
than two hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, and a city with more
than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand that serves as
the county seat in a county with more than seventy thousand and
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants, based on the
recommendations of Missouri Statewide Transit Assessment that
can serve as a foundational model for a statewide planning
system that analyzes and optimizes service delivery
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.511, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,000,000
Section 17.723. To the Department of Transportation
For protection of the public against hazards existing at railroad crossings
pursuant to Chapter 389, RSMo
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.540, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.530,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$25,000,000
Section 17.724. To the Department of Transportation

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 59
For a city with more than six thousand three hundred but fewer than
seven thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more
than two hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty
thousand inhabitants for an additional two trains to stop at a train
station per day, provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.531, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 17.726. To the Department of Transportation
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of a joint-use
military and civilian airport located in a county with more than
eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants, including land acquisition,
pursuant to the provisions of the State Block Grant Program
administered through the Federal Airport Improvement Program
and the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,200,000
Section 17.727. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and improvements of an airport in a city with
more than thirty-six thousand five hundred but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants, provided that no local matching funds shall
be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$350,000
Section 17.728. To the Department of Transportation
For the construction of a commercial terminal facility at a joint-use
military and civilian airport located in a county with more than
fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 60
a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer than seven
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.505, an Act of the 99th
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,327,044
Section 17.729. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and construction of an aircraft maintenance
facility at a joint-use military and civilian airport located in a
county with more than eighty thousand but fewer than one
hundred thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants, provided that no local matching funds shall be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$7,500,000
Section 17.731. To the Department of Transportation
For the relocation of the fuel farm facility at joint-use military and
civilian airport located in a county with more than eighty
thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants, provided that no local matching
funds shall be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$2,000,000
Section 17.732. To the Department of Transportation
For the construction and improvements of an airport terminal in any
county with more than twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 61
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,300,000
Section 17.733. To the Department of Transportation
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of a municipal
airport located in a city with more than forty thousand but fewer
than fifty-one thousand inhabitants partially located in a county
with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants, including land acquisition, pursuant to the provisions
of the State Block Grant Program administered through the
Federal Airport Improvement Program and the Infrastructure
Investment and Jobs Act
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.550, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.540,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)...................................................$3,400,000
Section 17.734. To the Department of Transportation
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of a joint-use
military and civilian airport located in a county with more than
eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants, including land acquisition,
pursuant to the provisions of the State Block Grant Program
administered through the Federal Airport Improvement Program
and the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.550, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.540,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)...................................................$8,800,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 62
Section 17.736. To the Department of Transportation
For a grant to a port authority located in any county with more than two
hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand
inhabitants, for assistance in port planning, acquisition, or
construction within the port district
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.555, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.550,
an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$6,700,000
Section 17.737. To the Department of Transportation
For repairs to a parking lot at a port located in city with more than three
thousand eight hundred but fewer than four thousand four
hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than
thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than five hundred but fewer than
two thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.551, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$500,000
Section 17.738. To the Department of Transportation
For improvements to a port located in a county with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five thousand
five hundred but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants, provided
that no local matching funds shall be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.551, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 17.740. To the Office of Administration
For capital improvements to support the largest and most prestigious
single-sport event host city to a non-profit performing arts center
that delivers accessible live entertainment for all audiences,

CCS SCS HCS HB 17 63
superior theatre arts education, impactful outreach programs and
events that utilize the venue, and helps sustain community
engagement programming that impacts nearly twenty-five
thousand locals each year and to a private non-profit organization
that connects all people to each other and the natural world to
promote understanding, appreciation and conservation, located in
any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county, provided that appropriations
shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 5, Section 5.236 an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund ...........................................................................................$633,470,378
Federal Funds ...........................................................................................................796,913,572
Other Funds .......................................................................................................... 1,383,189,981
Total ....................................................................................................................$2,813,573,931
